Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5705
Department of Economic Development; duties.

The Department of Economic Development shall:

(1) Create an application process for an eligible grantee to apply for a grant under the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act;

(2) Establish a process for awarding grants under the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act and how grant money will be provided to a grant recipient; and

(3) Create a process for recoupment of grant money that is not spent for the purpose of a grant or if the grant recipient does not meet all required obligations regarding the grant.

Laws 2024, LB600, § 5.